District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0743.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Modification Nos. M01, M02 and M03 to Contract No. CW131628 with
ID3 Trucking LLC Approval and Payment Authorization Emergency Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Pursuant to section 451 of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 803; D.C. Official Code § 1-204.51), and notwithstanding the
requirements of section 202 of the Procurement Practices Reform Act of 2010, effective April 8,
2011 (D.C. Law 18-371; D.C. Official Code § 2-352.02), and section 2346(d) and (e) of the
Small and Certified Business Enterprise Development and Assistance Act of 2005, effective
October 20, 2005 (D.C. Law 16-33; D.C. Official Code § 2-218.46(d)and (e)), the Council
approves Contract No. CW131628 and emergency Modification Nos. M01, M02, and M03
thereto with ID3 Trucking LLC and authorizes payment in the not-to-exceed amount of $2.5
million for the goods and services received and to be received under the contract.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Chief Financial Officer as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto), and shall remain in effect for no longer than
90 days, as provided for emergency acts of the Council of the District of Columbia in section
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
412(a) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 788;
D.C. Official Code § 1-204.12(a)).
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2